Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.420.010

Definitions.

As used in this compact, and except as otherwise provided, the following definitions shall govern the terms herein:

(1) "Active military member" means any person with full-time duty status in the armed forces of the United States, including members of the national guard and reserve.

(2) "Adverse action" means any limitation or restriction imposed by a member state's licensing authority, such as revocation, suspension, reprimand, probation, or limitation on the licensee's ability to work as a teacher.

(3) "Bylaws" means those bylaws established by the commission.

(4) "Career and technical education license" means a current, valid authorization issued by a member state's licensing authority allowing an individual to serve as a teacher in prekindergarten through grade 12 public educational settings in a specific career and technical education area.

(5) "Charter member states" means a member state that has enacted legislation to adopt this compact where such legislation predates the initial meeting of the commission after the effective date of the compact.

(6) "Commission" means the interstate administrative body which membership consists of delegates of all states that have enacted this compact, and which is known as the interstate teacher mobility compact commission.

(7) "Commissioner" means the delegate of a member state.

(8) "Eligible license" means a license to engage in the teaching profession which requires at least a bachelor's degree and the completion of a state approved program for teacher licensure.

(9) "Eligible military spouse" means the spouse of any individual in full-time duty status in the active armed forces of the United States, including members of the national guard and reserve on active duty moving as a result of a military mission or military career progression requirements or are on their terminal move as a result of separation or retirement (to include surviving spouses of deceased military members).

(10) "Executive committee" means a group of commissioners elected or appointed to act on behalf of, and within the powers granted to them by, the commission as provided for herein.

(11) "Licensing authority" means an official, agency, board, or other entity of a state that is responsible for the licensing and regulation of teachers authorized to teach in prekindergarten through grade 12 public educational settings.

(12) "Member state" means any state that has adopted this compact, including all agencies and officials of such a state.

(13) "Receiving state" means any state where a teacher has applied for licensure under this compact.

(14) "Rule" means any regulation promulgated by the commission under this compact, which shall have the force of law in each member state.

(15) "State" means a state, territory, or possession of the United States, and the District of Columbia.

(16) "State practice laws" means a member state's laws, rules, and regulations that govern the teaching profession, define the scope of such profession, and create the methods and grounds for imposing discipline.

(17) "State specific requirements" means a requirement for licensure covered in coursework or examination that includes content of unique interest to the state.

(18) "Teacher" means an individual who currently holds an authorization from a member state that forms the basis for employment in the prekindergarten through grade 12 public schools of the state to provide instruction in a specific subject area, grade level, or student population.

(19) "Unencumbered license" means a current, valid authorization issued by a member state's licensing authority allowing an individual to serve as a teacher in prekindergarten through grade 12 public educational settings. An unencumbered license is not a restricted, probationary, provisional, substitute, or temporary credential.

[ 2024 c 317 s 2.]